Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 5

Delegates

48-56-501. Delegates.

A corporation may provide in its charter or bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members.

The charter or bylaws may set forth provisions relating to:

The characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations and obligations of delegates, including their selection and removal;

Calling, noticing, holding and conducting meetings of delegates; and

Carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 6.50.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.